Maine, session 132, LD1077.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§3-B, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2015, c. 267, Pt. OOOO,
§2 and affected by §7, is repealed.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§3-B, as amended by PL 2019, c. 231, Pt. A, §§5
and 6 and PL 2021, c. 669, §5, is further amended by amending the 2nd blocked paragraph
to read:
"Grocery staples" includes drinking water that is placed in a container or package and is
intended for human consumption, bread and bread products, jam, jelly, pickles, honey,
condiments, maple syrup, spaghetti sauce or salad dressing when packaged as a separate
item for retail sale.